Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2333.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) The Kansas insurance department, as established
by K.S.A. 42-102, and amendments thereto, is hereby renamed the Kansas
department of insurance. All powers, duties and functions of the Kansas
insurance department are hereby transferred and imposed upon the Kansas
department of insurance.
(b) Whenever the Kansas insurance department, or words of like
effect, are referred to or designated by a statute, contract or other
document, and such reference or designation is in regard to any function,
power or duty of the Kansas insurance department, such reference or
designation shall be deemed to apply to the Kansas department of
insurance.
(c) All rules and regulations, order and directives of the
commissioner of insurance of the Kansas insurance department that are in
effect on July 1, 2025, shall continue to be effective and shall be deemed
to be rules and regulations, orders and directives of the commissioner of
insurance of the Kansas department of insurance until amended, revoked
or nullified pursuant to law.
New Sec. 2. (a) (1) The office of the securities commissioner of
Kansas, as established by K.S.A. 75-6301, and amendments thereto, is
hereby renamed the department of insurance, securities division. All
powers, duties and functions of the office of the securities commissioner of
Kansas are hereby transferred and imposed upon the department of
insurance, securities division.

HB 2333—Am. by SC 2
(2) The securities commissioner is hereby renamed the department of
insurance assistant commissioner, securities division. All powers, duties
and functions of the securities commissioner are hereby transferred and
imposed upon the department of insurance assistant commissioner,
securities division.
(b) (1) Whenever the office of the securities commissioner of Kansas,
or words of like effect, are referred to or designated by a statute, contract
or other document, and such reference or designation is in regard to any
function, power or duty of the office of the securities commissioner of
Kansas, such reference or designation shall be deemed to apply to the
department of insurance, securities division.
(2) Whenever the securities commissioner, or words of like effect, are
referred to or designated by statute, contract or other document, and such
reference or designation is in regard to any function, power or duty of the
securities commissioner of Kansas, such reference or designation shall be
deemed to apply to the department of insurance assistant commissioner,
securities division.
(c) All rules and regulations, orders and directives of the securities
commissioner of Kansas that are in effect on July 1, 2025, shall continue
to be effective and shall be deemed to be rules and regulations, orders and
directives of the department of insurance assistant commissioner, securities
division until amended, revoked or nullified pursuant to law.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 40-102 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 40-102. There is hereby established a department to be known as
the Kansas department of insurance department, and such department shall
have a. The chief officer entitled of the department shall be the
commissioner of insurance. The commissioner of insurance shall be
charged with the administration of all laws relating to insurance, insurance
companies and fraternal benefit societies doing business in this state and
all other duties that are or may be imposed upon such officer by law.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-6301 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 75-6301. (a) There is hereby established under the jurisdiction of
the commissioner of insurance a division to be known as the office of the
securities commissioner of Kansas the department of insurance, securities
division. The office department of insurance, securities division shall be
administered by the securities commissioner of Kansas department of
insurance assistant commissioner, securities division who shall be in the
unclassified service under the Kansas civil service act. The securities
commissioner department of insurance assistant commissioner, securities
division shall be appointed by the commissioner of insurance and be
subject to confirmation by the senate as provided in K.S.A. 75-4315b, and
amendments thereto. The securities commissioner department of
insurance assistant commissioner, securities division shall have special

HB 2333—Am. by SC 3
training and qualifications for such position, shall receive such
compensation as may be fixed by the commissioner of insurance and shall
serve at the pleasure of the commissioner of insurance. Except as provided
by K.S.A. 46-2601, and amendments thereto, no person appointed as
securities commissioner shall exercise any power, duty or function as
securities commissioner until confirmed by the senate.
(b) The securities commissioner department of insurance assistant
commissioner, securities division shall devote full time to the performance
of the duties of the office of the securities commissioner department of
insurance, securities division.
(c) The securities commissioner department of insurance assistant
commissioner, securities division may appoint directors and other
employees within the office of the securities commissioner department of
insurance, securities division as determined necessary by the securities
commissioner department of insurance assistant commissioner, securities
division to effectively carry out the mission of the office. All directors
appointed after the effective date of this act shall be in the unclassified
service under the Kansas civil service act, shall have special training and
qualifications for such positions, shall serve at the pleasure of the
securities commissioner department of insurance assistant commissioner,
securities division and shall receive compensation fixed by the securities
commissioner department of insurance assistant commissioner, securities
division and approved by the commissioner of insurance.
(d) Nothing in subsection (c) shall affect the classified status of any
person employed in the office of the securities commissioner department
of insurance, securities division on the day immediately preceding the
effective date of this act. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to limit the powers of the securities commissioner department of
insurance assistant commissioner, securities division pursuant to K.S.A.
75-2948, and amendments thereto.
(e) The office of the securities commissioner of Kansas department
of insurance, securities division shall cooperate with the department of
insurance department to consolidate administrative functions and cross-
appoint such employees as deemed necessary to provide efficiency. The
commissioner of insurance and the securities commissioner department of
insurance assistant commissioner, securities division are hereby authorized
to enter into agreements and adopt rules and regulations as necessary to
administer the provisions of this subsection.
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 75-6302, 75-6303, 75-6304, 75-6305, 75-6306 and 75-
6307 and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 40-102 and 75-6301 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 6. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book Kansas register.